Washington statutes.
RCW 11.114.210

Applicability.

This chapter applies to a transfer within the scope of RCW 11.114.020 made after July 1, 1991, if:

(1) The transfer purports to have been made under the Washington uniform gifts to minors act; or

(2) The instrument by which the transfer purports to have been made uses in substance the designation "as custodian under the uniform gifts to minors act" or "as custodian under the uniform transfers to minors act" of any other state, and the application of this chapter is necessary to validate the transfer.

[ 1991 c 193 s 21.]